Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1225
Storing explosives in violation of safety regulations; penalty.

(1) Any person who stores any explosive materials or uses in legitimate blasting operations any explosive materials in a manner not in conformity with safety regulations adopted and promulgated by the Nebraska State Patrol or the Secretary of the Treasury of the United States or who stores any explosive materials at a place not designated in a permit to store such explosive materials issued to such person by the Nebraska State Patrol commits the offense of storing explosives in violation of safety regulations.

(2) Storing explosives in violation of safety regulations is a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 257;

Laws 1989, LB 215, § 6.